Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska23-35,107
Hospital authority; bonds; purchase; cancellation.

The authority shall have the power out of any funds available therefor to purchase any bonds issued by it at a price not more than the principal amount thereof, the then applicable premium payable upon their redemption, or the next applicable redemption premium if the bonds are not then redeemable, and the accrued interest; Provided, that bonds payable exclusively from the revenue of a designated facility or facilities shall be purchased only out of any such revenue available therefor. All bonds so purchased shall be canceled. This section shall not apply to the redemption of bonds.

Laws 1971, LB 54, § 34;

R.S.1943, (1987), § 23-343.107.